Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-407.01
Deputy surveyor; private employment; no additional fees; cost of plat and field notes.

Whenever a survey, as provided by section 84-407, is made by a deputy land surveyor who is in the employ of the party requesting the survey, and who is receiving regular compensation from such party while making such survey, such party shall not be required to pay the fees as specified by section 84-407, but shall pay to the State Treasurer the cost of a certified copy of the plat and field notes which shall be based on a fee schedule to be adopted by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds.

Laws 1957, c. 395, § 2, p. 1360.